Massachusetts, session 194th, H1967.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1: Section 2B of Chapter 260 of the General Laws, as appearing in the
2018 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following new paragraph in the section:-
Nothing in this section shall apply to any tort actions for damages due to latent diseases
caused by exposure to toxic substances including, but not limited to, asbestos.
SECTION 2:
Section 1 shall be effective for all causes of action accruing before, on, or after the date
of its enactment, including any cause of action now pending.
of 1